Wisconsin, session 2025, SB407.
do enact as follows:SB407,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB407,28Section 2. 20.435 (5) (bk) of the statutes is created to read:SB407,2,11920.435 (5) (bk) Integrated mental health facility grant program. The amounts 10in the schedule for an integrated mental health facility grant under 2025 Wisconsin 11Act .... (this act), section 4 (1).SB407,312Section 3. 20.435 (5) (bk) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 13.... (this act), is repealed.SB407,414Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.SB407,2,1515(1) Integrated mental health facility grant program.SB407,2,2116(a) In fiscal year 2025-26, the department of health services shall, subject to 17par. (b), award a onetime grant to Rogers Behavioral Health to construct and build 18an integrated mental health facility in the Chippewa Valley region of this state that 19includes a crisis stabilization unit, residential treatment center, partial 20hospitalization/intensive outpatient program, and supportive living to provide 21adolescents and adults with a full continuum of care for mental health issues.SB407,3,222(b) The department of health services shall award a grant under par. (a) only 23if Rogers Behavioral Health submits to the department a letter of intent to use any 1grant awarded under par. (a) for constructing and building an integrated mental 2health facility as described under par. (a) and proof of purchase or lease of land.SB407,53Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 4publication, except as follows:SB407,3,55(1) The repeal of s. 20.435 (5) (bk) takes effect on July 1, 2027.SB407,3,66